Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.40.100

Trustees—Appointment—Terms—Quorum—Vacancies.

(1) The governance of The Evergreen State College shall be vested in a board of trustees consisting of eight members, one of whom shall be a student. The governor shall select the student member from a list of candidates, of at least three and not more than five, submitted by the student body. They shall be appointed by the governor with the consent of the senate and, except for the student member, shall hold their offices for a term of six years from the first day of October and until their successors are appointed and qualified. The student member shall hold his or her office for a term of one year from the first day of July and until the first day of July of the following year or until his or her successor is appointed and qualified, whichever is later. The student member shall be a full-time student in good standing at the college at the time of appointment.

(2) Five members of the board constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. In case of a vacancy, or when an appointment is made after the date of expiration of the term, the governor shall fill the vacancy for the remainder of the term of the trustee whose office has become vacant or expired.

(3) Except for the term of the student member, no more than the terms of two members will expire simultaneously on the last day of September in any one year.

(4) A student appointed under this section shall excuse himself or herself from participation or voting on matters relating to the hiring, discipline, or tenure of faculty members and personnel.

[ 2006 c 78 s 4; 1998 c 95 s 4; 1985 c 137 s 2; 1979 ex.s. c 103 s 5; 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 65; 1973 c 62 s 11; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.40.100. Prior: 1967 ex.s. c 5 s 2; 1957 c 147 s 3; prior: (i) 1909 c 97 p 251 s 1, part; 1897 c 118 s 212; 1893 c 107 s 1; RRS s 4604, part. (ii) 1909 c 97 p 251 s 2; 1897 c 118 s 213; 1893 c 107 s 2; RRS s 4605. Formerly RCW 28.81.020.]

NOTES:

Present terms not affected—Severability—1979 ex.s. c 103: See notes following RCW 28B.20.100.

Severability—Nomenclature—Savings—1977 ex.s. c 169: See notes following RCW 28B.10.016.

Savings—Severability—1973 c 62: See notes following RCW 28B.10.510.